Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Chapter 07. Registration of Voters.
Sec. 15.07.160.
Unlawful action.

Except as provided in AS

15.07.135

, a registration official may not refuse to register a person who is qualified to vote under provisions of AS

15.05.010

(1) — (3).

A person knowingly lacking the qualifications of a voter may not register under AS

15.07.030

to vote.

[Repealed, § 231 ch 100 SLA 1980.]

History.

(§ 2 ch 211 SLA 1968; am § 23 ch 32 SLA 1971; am § 231 ch 100 SLA 1980; am §§ 3, 4 ch 85 SLA 1986; am § 34 ch 21 SLA 2000)

Sec. 15.07.170.
False statements. [Repealed, § 49 ch 86 SLA 1996.]

Sec. 15.07.180.
Fees prohibited.

A registration official may not accept a fee from an applicant applying for registration.

History.

(§ 2 ch 211 SLA 1968)

Sec. 15.07.190.
Violation of AS 15.07.180.

A person who violates AS

15.07.180

is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction is punishable by imprisonment for not more than one year, or by a fine of not more than $1,000, or by both.

History.

(§ 2 ch 211 SLA 1968; am § 2 ch 31 SLA 1969; am § 13 ch 86 SLA 1996)

Sec. 15.07.195.
Certain information in voter registration records confidential.

The following information set out in state voter registration records is confidential and is not open to public inspection:

the voter’s age or date of birth;

the voter’s social security number, or any part of that number;

the voter’s driver’s license number;

the voter’s voter identification number;

the voter’s place of birth;

the voter’s signature.

In addition to the information in (a) of this section, a voter may elect in writing to keep the voter’s residential address confidential and not open to public inspection if the voter provides a separate mailing address. However, notwithstanding an election under this subsection, a voter’s residential address may be disclosed to

a watcher appointed under AS

15.10.170

and, in the case of a watcher appointed by an organization or group sponsoring or opposing an initiative, referendum, or recall group, authorized by the director;

an observer of a recount provided under AS

15.20.440(b)

by a candidate, political party, or organized group having a direct interest in the recount; or

the subject of a recall election if the voter voted in the recall election.

Notwithstanding other provisions, and in compliance with federal law, information made confidential by this section may be released by the division

to a local, state, or federal government agency, including to the child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

or the child support enforcement agency of another state; the agency receiving information under this paragraph may use the information only for governmental purposes authorized under law;

in compliance with a court order;

to a person holding a writ of execution against the person or property of the voter;

if the voter about whom information has been requested has provided written consent to the release; or

to another state or an organized group of states for the purpose of ensuring the accuracy of the state’s voter registration list prepared under AS

15.07.125

and the eligibility of persons on the list to vote in state elections, if the other state or organized group of states maintains the confidentiality of the information using information security management policies and procedures that comply with

the information security standards of the International Organization for Standardization; or

a published information security standard used by the state and approved by the Department of Administration.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit the release of a voter’s voter ascension number if that information may be released under other provisions of law.

History.

(§ 1 ch 181 SLA 2004; am § 2 ch 13 SLA 2016)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2004, in (c)(1) of this section, “child support services agency created in AS

25.27.010

” was substituted for “child support enforcement agency created in AS

25.27.010

” in order to reconcile chs. 107 and 181, SLA 2004.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective May 28, 2016, in (c), added (c)(5), and made a related change.

Sec. 15.07.200.
Registration supervision.

The registration program is under the supervision of the director in accordance with AS

15.10.105

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 211 SLA 1968; am § 11 ch 116 SLA 1972; am § 21 ch 100 SLA 1980; am § 33 ch 59 SLA 1982)